Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3528
Applicability of sections.

Sections 71-3523 to 71-3527 do not apply to high-level radioactive waste or transuranic waste shipped by or for the United States Government for military, national security, or national defense purposes. Sections 71-3523 to 71-3527 do not require disclosure of defense information or restricted data as defined in the federal Atomic Energy Act of 1954.

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 6.